Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.49.110

Assets, business—Time for conformance with state law.

If a merging or converting state or national bank has assets which do not conform to the requirements of state law for the resulting state bank or carries on business activities which are not permitted for the resulting state bank, the director may permit a reasonable time to conform with state law.

[ 1994 c 92 s 148; 1955 c 33 s 30.49.110. Prior: 1953 c 234 s 11. Formerly RCW 30.49.110.]